Washington statutes.
RCW 15.17.143

Certificates of compliance—Petition by shipper—Rules.

Any shipper or packer of apples, apricots, cherries, pears, peaches, Italian prunes, potatoes, or asparagus may petition the director for authority to issue certificates of compliance for each season. The director may issue certificate of compliance agreements, granting this authority, on terms and conditions defined by rule. Certificates of compliance shall only be issued for fruits or vegetables that are in full compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.

[ 1998 c 154 s 20.]